Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 50. PROMOTIONAL PERMIT

Sec. 50.001. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. The holder of a promotional permit may, on behalf of a distiller, brewer, rectifier, or winery with whom the promotional permit holder has entered into a contract for the purposes of this chapter, engage in activities to promote and enhance the sale of an alcoholic beverage in this state, including activities that take place on the premises of the holder of a permit or license under this code.

Redesignated from Alcoholic Beverage Code, Chapter 54 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 1365), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 150, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 50.003. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES. The holder of a promotional permit may not hold an interest, directly or indirectly, in a permit or license issued under this code other than a contract to promote and enhance the sale of alcoholic beverages as authorized by this chapter.

Redesignated from Alcoholic Beverage Code, Chapter 54 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 1365), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Sec. 50.004. NONAPPLICABILITY OF CERTAIN REQUIREMENTS TO PERMIT HOLDER. Notwithstanding Section 6.03, 11.46, 11.61, or 109.53, or any other law, the holder of a promotional permit is not required to be a resident of this state.

Redesignated from Alcoholic Beverage Code, Chapter 54 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 1365), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.